Washington statutes.
RCW 43.30.440

Oaths may be administered by supervisor and deputies.

The supervisor and duly authorized deputies may administer oaths.

[ 2003 c 334 s 116; 1965 c 8 s 43.30.180. Prior: 1957 c 38 s 18. Formerly RCW 43.30.180.]

NOTES:

Intent—2003 c 334: See note following RCW 79.02.010.